Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Trotting and Harness Racing

230.610.
Definitions for KRS 230.620 to 230.760. [Repealed.]

230.620.
Kentucky harness racing commission — Advisory members — Organization — Biennial report — Compensation and reimbursement. [Repealed.]

230.622.
Kentucky Harness Racing Commission — Organization — Former advisory members’ status — Biennial report — Compensation and reimbursement. [Repealed.]

230.630.
Authority and power of commission. [Repealed.]

230.640.
Purpose — Policy — Penalty. [Repealed.]

230.650.
Secretary of commission — Other personnel. [Repealed.]

230.660.
Appointment of additional employees — Payment of salaries. [Repealed.]

230.670.
Legal counsel. [Repealed.]

230.680.
Requirement for license — Fee. [Repealed.]

230.690.
License to conduct horse racing or engage in simulcasting or intertrack wagering as a receiving track. [Repealed.]

230.700.
Attendants’ licenses. [Repealed.]

230.710.
Format and content of licenses. [Repealed.]

230.720.
Suspension or revocation of license — Appeal. [Repealed.]

230.730.
Proceedings on appeal. [Repealed.]

230.740.
Scope of provisions — Taxes. [Repealed.]

230.750.
Maximum allowable commission for harness track — Allocation of portion of commission.

The commission, including the tax levied in KRS

138.510

, deducted from the gross amount wagered by the person, corporation, or association which operates a harness horse track under the jurisdiction of the racing commission at which betting is conducted through a pari-mutuel or other similar system shall not exceed eighteen percent (18%) of the gross amount handled on straight wagering pools and twenty-five percent (25%) of the gross amount handled on multiple wagering pools, plus the breaks, which shall be made and calculated to the penny, except on races previously run in which the breaks shall be made and calculated to the penny or retained in the pari-mutuel pools. Multiple wagering pools shall include daily double, perfecta, double perfecta, quinella, double quinella, trifecta, and other types of exotic betting. An amount equal to three percent (3%) of the total amount wagered and included in the commission of a harness host track shall be allocated by the harness host track in the following manner. Two percent (2%) shall be allocated to the host for capital improvements, promotions, including advertising, or purses, as the host track shall elect. Three-quarters of one percent (3/4 of 1%) shall be allocated to overnight purses. One-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) shall be allocated to the Kentucky standardbred development fund. This allocation shall be made after deduction from the commission of the pari-mutuel tax but prior to any other deduction, allocation or division of the commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 346, § 15; 1976, ch. 343, § 3; 1980, ch. 83, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 296, § 18, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 376, § 11, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 159, § 11, effective March 30, 1990; 1992, ch. 109, § 34, effective March 30, 1992; 2004, ch. 191, § 43, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 484, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 47, § 7, effective June 24, 2015; 2022 ch. 124, § 23, effective July 14, 2022.

230.752.
Harness racetracks — Exemption from tax under KRS 138.510(2) — Use of moneys not paid as tax.

All harness racetracks licensed by the racing commission shall not be required to pay the excise tax imposed under KRS 138.510(2), and the amount that would have been paid under those subsections shall be retained by the track to promote and maintain its facilities and its live meet.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 173, § 8, effective July 13, 2004; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 62, effective June 26, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 485, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/2004). This statute, as enacted in 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 173, sec. 8, contained a reference to “the commission.” The Reviser of Statutes has changed this reference to read “the authority.” The change was made in accordance with 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 191, sec. 56, which instructs the Reviser of Statutes to “replace references in the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the agencies, subagencies, and officers affected by this Act with references to the appropriate successor agencies, subagencies, and officers established by this Act.” Under 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 191, the Kentucky Racing Commission was abolished, and its successor agency is the Kentucky Horse Racing Authority.

230.760.
Exemption from liability.

No licensee conducting a race or meet hereunder, no member of the racing commission, judge, or assistant official appointed to act as such pursuant to this chapter, shall be liable for damages to any person, association, or corporation for any cause whatsoever arising out of or from the performance by the licensee, member of the racing commission, judge, or assistant official of his duties and the exercise of his discretion with respect thereto, so long as he acted in good faith, without malice or improper motive.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 346, § 16; 1992, ch. 109, § 35, effective March 30, 1992; 2010, ch. 24, § 486, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/20/2006). This statute, as enacted in 1974 Ky. Acts ch. 346, sec. 16, contained references to “the commission” and “commissioner.” The Reviser of Statutes has changed these references to read “the authority” and “member of the authority.” The change was made in accordance with 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 191, sec. 56, which instructs the Reviser of Statutes to “replace references in the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the agencies, subagencies, and officers affected by this Act with references to the appropriate successor agencies, subagencies, and officers established by this Act.” Under 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 191, the Kentucky Racing Commission was abolished, and its successor agency is the Kentucky Horse Racing Authority.

230.770.
Kentucky standardbred development fund — Contributions — Purposes — Distribution — Administrative regulations.

There is hereby created a trust and revolving fund for the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission, designated as the Kentucky standardbred development fund, consisting of money allocated to the fund under the provisions of KRS

138.510

, together with any other money contributed to or allocated to the fund from all other sources. For the purposes of this section, “development fund” or “fund” means the Kentucky standardbred development fund. Money to the credit of the development fund shall be distributed by the Treasurer for the purposes provided in this section, upon authorization of the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission and upon approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Money to the credit of the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward in the fund to the succeeding fiscal year.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall use the development fund to promote races, and to provide purses for races, for Kentucky-bred standardbred horses.

The racing commission shall provide for distribution of money to the credit of the development fund to persons, corporations, or associations operating licensed standardbred race tracks within Kentucky on an equitable basis, for the purpose of conducting separate races for Kentucky-bred standardbred horses, both trotting and pacing.

Money distributed from the development fund to licensed standardbred race tracks within the Commonwealth shall be used exclusively to promote races and provide purses for races conditioned to admit only Kentucky-bred standardbred horses.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall fix the amount of money to be paid from the development fund to be added to the purse provided for each race by the licensed operator of the track; shall fix the dates and conditions of races to be held by licensed race tracks; and shall promulgate administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission may promulgate administrative regulations necessary to determine the eligibility of horses for entry in races for which a portion of the purse is provided by money of the development fund, including administrative regulations for the eligibility, residency, and registration of mares, stallions, and progeny thereof. Registration of stallions may occur any time during the breeding season, but shall occur no later than December 31 of the year of conception of the eligible horse.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall appoint qualified personnel necessary to supervise registration of, or determination of eligibility of, horses entitled to entry in races, a portion of the purse of which is provided by the development fund, to assist the racing commission in determining the conditions, class, and quality of the fund supported race program to be established hereunder so as to carry out the purposes of this section. These persons shall serve at the pleasure of the racing commission and compensation shall be fixed by the racing commission. The compensation of personnel and necessary expenses shall be paid out of the development fund. The racing commission shall promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of this section, and shall administer the Kentucky sire stakes program created hereby in a manner best designed to promote and aid in the development of the horse industry in Kentucky; to upgrade the quality of racing in Kentucky; and to improve the quality of horses bred in Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 343, § 1; 1988, ch. 376, § 12, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 109, § 36, effective March 30, 1992; 2004, ch. 191, § 40, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 234, § 3, effective April 22, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 487, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 57, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 71, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by
2010 Ky. Acts chs. 24 and
57. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 57, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under
KRS

446.250

.

(4/22/2006).
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 234, sec. 4, provides that the Act, which included an amendment to this statute, shall be known as the “2006 Kentucky Equine Competitiveness Act.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

In view of the fact that subsection (4) of this section gives the Kentucky Harness Racing Commission the power to fix the dates and conditions of the Kentucky Standardbred Development Fund races to be staged, and further in view of the fact that 811 KAR 1:200, § 13, directs that the Commission shall annually make provisions for the distribution of funds for stake races, it is exceedingly evident that the fund, if suddenly faced with the situation where only three tracks are to be awarded racing dates, may stage 24 races, staging 8 races at each of the three tracks which have been granted racing dates.

OAG 83-441

.